District of Columbia statutes.
4-344.01

Establishment of the Adoption Support Fund.

(a)

There is established the Adoption Support Fund (“Support Fund”). The Support Fund shall be comprised of $3 million of the $5 million appropriated in the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2000, approved November 29, 1999 (Pub. L. No. 106-113; 113 Stat. 1501), and additional funds in their entirety which Congress may appropriate from time to time for the purpose of providing support incentives for foster parents who adopt District of Columbia children and enhancing recruitment and support of prospective adoptive families.

(b)

Monies in the Support Fund shall be used only for the following purposes:

(1)

$1 million to establish a scholarship fund to support postsecondary education and training for adopted children;

(2)

$1 million to create an Adoption Resource Center with post-adoption service capacity; and

(3)

$1 million to enhance recruitment and support of prospective adoptive families.

(c)

The Child and Family Services Agency shall administer the Support Fund.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3805a
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2202, 48 DCR 6981
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2002 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).